Hawaii statutes.
§333E-4 Membership on the state council.
The state council shall consist of voting members as described in federal law,
for staggered terms. The members of the council shall be residents of the
State. The council shall at all times include in its membership six
representatives from the neighbor islands with a minimum of one representative
from Hawaii, Kauai, and Maui county and representatives of the following,
unless these programs are no longer in existence in the State: state entities
that administer funds provided under federal law relating to individuals with
disabilities, including the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. 701 et seq.),
the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. 1400 et seq.), the
Older Americans Act of 1965 (42 U.S.C. 3001 et seq.), and Titles V and XIX of
the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 701 et seq. and 1396 et seq.), university
centers for excellence in developmental disabilities education, research, and
service, and the state protection and advocacy system, and local and
nongovernmental agencies, and private nonprofit groups concerned with services
for individuals with developmental disabilities in this State.

(1) Not less than sixty per cent of the membership of
the council shall consist of individuals who are:

(A) Individuals with developmental
disabilities or their parents; or

(B) Immediate relatives or guardians of such
persons, and who are not employees of a state agency which receives funds or
provides services under the state council, or managing employees, or persons
with an ownership or controlling interest of any other entity which receives
funds or provides services under the state council;

(2) Of the members of the council described in
paragraph (1):

(A) At least one-third shall be individuals
with developmental disabilities; and

(B) At least one-third shall be immediate
relatives or guardians of such person, of which at least one shall be an
immediate relative or guardian of an institutionalized individual with
developmental disabilities; and

(3) The members of the state council shall serve
without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for any actual and necessary
expenses incurred in connection with the performance of their duties under this
chapter. [L 1975, c 198, §4; am L 1979, c 180, pt of §1; am L 1983, c 121, §2;
am L 1986, c 45, §1; am L 2001, c 175, §4]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next